Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 4

Miscellaneous Committee Provisions

3-4-101. Subpoena powers.

Any standing committee or select committee of the general assembly shall have the power to issue subpoenas, including subpoenas duces tecum, and to enforce the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, documents, papers or other items of evidence.

In proceedings before such committees, the provisions of §§ 3-3-108 — 3-3-121 shall apply.

Acts 1967, ch. 125, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-801.

Cross-References. Interim meetings of committees investigating matter of state business, §3-4-102.

Investigation committees, title 3, ch. 3.

Law Reviews.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

3-4-102. Interim meetings.

Any standing, special or select committee of the general assembly may meet during any recess of the general assembly, in the interim period between sessions, or after adjournment, for the purpose of considering or investigating any matter of state business within the scope of its authority.

Meetings shall be called by the chair of any such committee and/or upon the request of a majority of the committee members.

Senate and house of representatives committees having the same area of interest may have joint meetings if they wish, but each committee shall file a report, with recommendations, if any, with the chief clerk of its house, with the request that copies be forwarded immediately to each member of that house.

Committees investigating any matter of state business shall have the powers granted to investigating committees in chapter 3 of this title.

Members of committees meeting as provided in this section are entitled to such allowances and expenses for attending meetings as may be established by law.

All committees shall meet within the boundaries of the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1967, ch. 180, § 1; 1974, ch. 613, § 5; T.C.A., § 3-802.

Cross-References. Expenses and mileage, §§3-3-105,3-4-103.

3-4-103. Expenses — Mileage allowance.

Each member of any standing, select or special committee of the general assembly, shall be paid the same expense allowance provided in §3-1-106 for each day in attendance at any authorized meeting of a committee of which such person is a member, and a mileage allowance at the same rate as provided in §3-1-106, for each mile traveled from the member's home to the site of the meeting and back.

Acts 1967, ch. 6, § 2; modified; Acts 1974, ch. 613, § 2; T.C.A., § 3-803.

3-4-104. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Select or special committee” means any committee, or subcommittee thereof, of the general assembly appointed by:

Either the house of representatives or by the senate;

Joint action of the house of representatives and the senate;

The speaker of the house of representatives or the speaker of the senate or a joint committee appointed by both speakers in accordance with the rules of proceedings adopted by the respective houses; or

The speaker of the house of representatives or the speaker of the senate or a joint committee appointed by both speakers; and

“Standing committee” means any standing committee, or subcommittee thereof, of the general assembly created by the rules of proceedings of the house of representatives or the senate.

Acts 1974, ch. 613, § 4; T.C.A., § 3-804; Acts 1981, ch. 50, § 1.